Tennessee, session 114, SB1827.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 9, Chapter 1, is amended by adding the
following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Coin" means:
(A) Precious metal fabricated into a product of uniform shape,
size, design, content, weight, and purity that is suitable for or customarily
used as currency, as a medium of exchange, or as the medium for
purchase, sale, storage, transfer, or delivery of precious metal in a retail
or wholesale transaction; or
(B) Refined precious metal bullion, stamped or imprinted with its
weight and purity and valued primarily based on its metal content and not
its form;
(2) "Legal tender" means a recognized medium of exchange for the
payment of debts and taxes;
(3) "Person" means an individual; state, local government, political
subdivision, or any agent or agency thereof; company; corporation; partnership;
firm; trust; organization; or association; and
(4) "Precious metal" means gold and silver.
(b) Precious metal coins are legal tender in this state.
SB1827
007995
- 1 -

(c) A person shall not compel another person to use or accept precious metal
coins as legal tender, unless expressly agreed to or authorized by law or contract.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 007995